Massachusetts, session 194th, S641.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Pursuant to section 3 of chapter 103 of the General Laws, as appearing in
the 2022 Official Edition, the commissioner of district three shall update 995 CMR 4.19 to strike
subsection (1) requiring membership in Northeast Marine Pilots and amend subsection (10) to
ensure that duly qualified pilots can operate independently from Northeast Marine Pilots. The
commissioner shall ensure that compulsory state pilotage work is apportioned among pilots duly
qualified to operate within district 3 regardless of business affiliation or membership in any
private organization or entity.
SECTION 2. The commissioner shall update said regulations no later than 180 days
following passage of this act.
of 1